apertium-sgw.sgw.twol
Alphabet
ኸ ኹ ኺ ኻ ኼ ኽ ኾ ዀ ዂ ዃ ዄ ዅ
ⷐ ⷑ ⷒ ⷓ ⷔ ⷕ ⷖ
ለ ሉ ሊ ላ ሌ ል ሎ
መ ሙ ሚ ማ ሜ ም ሞ ᎀ ᎁ ሟ ᎂ ᎃ 
ረ ሩ ሪ ራ ሬ ር ሮ
ሰ ሱ ሲ ሳ ሴ ስ ሶ
ሸ ሹ ሺ ሻ ሼ ሽ ሾ
ቀ ቁ ቂ ቃ ቄ ቅ ቆ ቈ ቊ ቋ ቌ ቍ
ⷀ ⷁ ⷂ ⷃ ⷄ ⷅ ⷆ
በ ቡ ቢ ባ ቤ ብ ቦ ᎄ ᎅ ቧ ᎆ ᎇ
ቨ ቩ ቪ ቫ ቬ ቭ ቮ
ተ ቱ ቲ ታ ቴ ት ቶ
ቸ ቹ ቺ ቻ ቼ ች ቾ
ነ ኑ ኒ ና ኔ ን ኖ
ኘ ኙ ኚ ኛ ኜ ኝ ኞ
ኧ ኡ ኢ አ ኤ እ ኦ
ከ ኩ ኪ ካ ኬ ክ ኮ ኰ ኲ ኳ ኴ ኵ
ⷈ ⷉ ⷊ ⷋ ⷌ ⷍ ⷎ
ወ ዉ ዊ ዋ ዌ ው ዎ
ዘ ዙ ዚ ዛ ዜ ዝ ዞ 	
ዠ ዡ ዢ ዣ ዤ ዥ ዦ
የ ዩ ዪ ያ ዬ ይ ዮ
ደ ዱ ዲ ዳ ዴ ድ ዶ
ጀ ጁ ጂ ጃ ጄ ጅ ጆ
ገ ጉ ጊ ጋ ጌ ግ ጎ ጐ ጒ ጓ ጔ ጕ
ⷘ ⷙ ⷚ ⷛ ⷜ ⷝ ⷞ
ጠ ጡ ጢ ጣ ጤ ጥ ጦ
ጨ ጩ ጪ ጫ ጬ ጭ ጮ
ጰ ጱ ጲ ጳ ጴ ጵ ጶ 	
ጸ ጹ ጺ ጻ ጼ ጽ ጾ 	
ፈ ፉ ፊ ፋ ፌ ፍ ፎ ᎈ ᎉ ፏ ᎊ ᎋ
ፐ ፑ ፒ ፓ ፔ ፕ ፖ ᎌ ᎍ ፗ ᎎ ᎏ

! New orthography goes here
ሐ ሑ ሒ ሓ ሔ ሕ ሖ 𞟨 𞟩 ሗ 𞟪 𞟫
𞟠 𞟡 𞟢 𞟣 𞟤 𞟥 𞟦
𞟭 𞟮
𞟰 𞟱 𞟲
ቐ ቑ ቒ ቓ ቔ ቕ ቖ
𞟳 𞟴
𞟵 𞟶 𞟷
ኸ ኹ ኺ ኻ ኼ ኽ ኾ
𞟸 𞟹 𞟺
ጘ ጙ ጚ ጛ ጜ ጝ ጞ
𞟻 𞟼
𞟽 𞟾



%{ቨ%}:ቨ %{ቨ%}:በ
%{ቩ %}:ቩ  %{ቩ%}:ቡ
%{ቪ%}:ቪ %{ቪ%}:ቢ 
%{ቫ%}:ቫ %{ቫ%}:ባ
%{ቴ%}:ቬ %{ቴ%}:ቤ
%{ቭ%}:ቭ %{ቭ%}:ብ 
%{ቮ%}:ቮ %{ቮ%}:ቦ

%{ተ%}:ተ %{ተ%}፡ቸ
%{ቱ %}:ቱ  %{ቱ%}:ቹ
%{ቲ%}:ቲ %{ቲ%}:ቹ 
%{ታ%}:ታ %{ታ%}:ቻ
%{ቴ%}:ቴ %{ቴ%}:ቼ
%{ት%}:ት %{ት%}:ች 
%{ቶ%}:ቶ %{ቶ%}:ቾ

%{ረ%}:ረ %{ረ%}፡የ
%{ሩ %}:ሩ  %{ሩ%}:ዩ
%{ሪ%}:ሪ %{ሪ%}:ዪ
%{ራ%}:ራ %{ራ%}:ያ
%{ሬ%}:ሬ %{ሬ%}:ዬ
%{ራ%}:ር %{ር%}:ይ
%{ሮ%}:ሮ %{ሮ%}:ዮ
  

%{ኧ%}:0
%{አ%}:0
%>:0
;
Sets

Vowel = ኧ ኡ ኢ አ ኤ እ ኦ
 ;
 
Rules
"Add ኧ vowel to consnant"
Cx:Cy <=> _ %>: %{ኧ%}: ;
  where Cx in ( ብ ት ክ ሕ ሕ ል ም ስ ር ሸ ቅ ቭ ን ኝ ች ጭ ው ዝ ዥ ይ ድ ጅ ግ ጥ ፕ ጵ ጽ ፍ )
        Cy in ( በ ተ ከ ኸ ሐ ለ መ ሰ ረ ሸ ቀ ቨ ነ ኘ ቸ ጨ ወ ዘ ዠ የ ደ ጀ ገ ጠ ፐ ፐ ጸ ፈ )
      matched;
"Add አ vowel to consnant"
Cx:Cy <=> _ %>: %{አ%}: ;
  where Cx in ( ብ ት ክ ሕ ሕ ል ም ስ ር ሸ ቅ ቭ ን ኝ ች ጭ ው ዝ ዥ ይ ድ ጅ ግ ጥ ፕ ጵ ጽ ፍ )
        Cy in ( ባ ታ ካ ሓ ሓ ላ ማ ሳ ራ ሻ ቃ ቫ ና ኛ ቻ ጫ ዋ ዛ ዣ ያ ዳ ጃ ጋ ጣ ፓ ፓ ጻ ፋ )
      matched;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
